Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
225M

STATE
PLANNING

Section

225M-1 Purpose

225M-2 Office of planning, establishment;
responsibilities

225M-3 Cooperation

225M-4 Allocation of funds

225M-5 to 7 Repealed

Note

State goal for affordable rental housing units; special
action team (terminated December 31, 2019); annual reports to 2017-2019
legislature. L 2016, c 127.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next